Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,114
Irrigation districts; grant of additional powers.

In addition to all other powers, an irrigation district shall have the powers granted in sections 46-1,115 to 46-1,126.

Laws 1925, c. 128, § 1, p. 336;

C.S.1929, § 46-178;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,114.

Refinancing bonds and coupons of irrigation district issued hereunder, when due and funds are available for that purpose on presentment, are payable by county treasurer in order of presentment by holder thereof. State ex rel. Brown v. Taylor, 125 Neb. 228, 249 N.W. 586 (1933).